Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-206
Board of trustees; journal; roll calls; public proceedings.

The village board of trustees shall keep a journal of the board's proceedings and, at the desire of any member, shall cause the yeas and nays to be taken and entered on the journal on any question or ordinance, and the proceedings shall be public.

Laws 1879, § 45, p. 203;

R.S.1913, § 5056;

C.S.1922, § 4228;

C.S.1929, § 17-206;

R.S.1943, § 17-206;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 67.
August 24, 2017